Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 7.1 The Office of Internal Audit

35-7.1-1.
Establishment of office of internal audit.

There is hereby established within the office of management and budget an office of internal audit. Within the office of internal audit, there shall be a chief, appointed by the director of administration, who shall be the administrative head of the office. The person so selected to be the chief shall be selected without regard to political affiliation and with a demonstrated ability in the following areas: accounting, auditing, financial analysis, investigation, management analysis, and public administration. The office of internal audit will report to the office of management and budget director. Any reference in general law to the “bureau of audits” shall mean the office of internal audit.

The chief of the office of internal audit shall not hold, or be a candidate for, any elective or any other appointed public office while a chief. No current chief shall hold a position in any political party or political committee, or, aside from voting, actively engage in the political campaign of any candidate for public office that may cause a real or perceived conflict of interest, or participate as a board member of any entity that receives state or federal funding.

No employee of the office of internal audit shall hold, or be a candidate for, any elective public office while an employee, nor shall he/she hold a position in any political party or political committee or, aside from voting, actively engage in a political campaign of any candidate for public office that may cause a real or perceived conflict of interest, or participate as a board member of any not for profit entity that receives state or federal funding.

Purposes and scope. The office of internal audit is authorized to conduct audits of any state department, state agency, or private entity that is a recipient of state funding or state grants. In addition, the office of internal audit is authorized, but not limited to, evaluating the efficiency of operations and internal controls, preventing and detecting fraud, waste, abuse, or mismanagement in the expenditure of public funds, whether federal, state, or local, that are related to any and all state programs and operations as well as the procurement of any goods, services, or construction, by public bodies. As deemed necessary or expedient by the office of internal audit, audits may be made relative to the financial affairs or the economy and efficiency of management of each department, agency or public body. The office of internal audit shall determine which such audits shall be performed in accordance with a risk-based evaluation.

“Public body” or “public bodies” under this chapter shall mean state agencies, bureaus, divisions, departments, offices, commissions, boards, institutions, including the public institutions of higher education, districts, authorities, quasi-agencies, or political subdivisions created by the general assembly, or the governor. “Public body” shall also include any city and town within the state of Rhode Island but municipal audits under this chapter shall only cover the expenditure of state or federal funds distributed by the state. Audits and investigations of public bodies may include the expenditures by nongovernmental agencies of federal, state, and local public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-2.
Duties.

The chief of internal audit shall supervise, coordinate, and/or conduct audits, civil and administrative investigations, and inspections or oversight reviews, when necessary, relating to expenditure of state or federal funds, or to any and all state programs and operations, as well as the procurement of any supplies, services, or construction, by public bodies. In the course of an audit or investigation, the office of internal audit shall review statutes and regulations of the public body and shall determine if such a public body is in compliance and shall make recommendations concerning the efficiency of operations, and the effect of such statutes or regulations on internal controls and the prevention and detection of fraud, waste and abuse. The chief of internal audit may recommend policies or procedures that may strengthen internal controls, or assist in the prevention or detection of fraud, waste, and abuse or mismanagement.

The person, or persons, with legal authority for any public body may request the assistance of the office of internal audit. Any such request must include the scope of services requested and the work to be performed. In such events, the chief, with the approval of the director of management and budget, may assign personnel to conduct, supervise, or coordinate such activity as deemed necessary and appropriate to perform his/her duties in a diligent and prudent manner. The expenses for any such assistance requested by the public body shall be reimbursed by the public body to the office of internal audit. The chief may recommend policies for the conduct, supervision, or coordination of the relationship, between state and other state, local governmental agencies as well as federal governmental agencies and nongovernmental entities with respect to all matters relating to the prevention and detection of fraud, waste, abuse or mismanagement in or relating to any and all programs and activities of the state of Rhode Island.

When it is determined by the office of internal audit that an audit is necessary because there is sufficient evidence to believe that there may have been fiscal impropriety, wrongdoing, or fiscal mismanagement by any agent, employee, board member, or commissioner of any public body, the office of internal audit may conduct a forensic examination of such entity. All costs associated with the forensic examination shall be paid, as deemed appropriate, either by the examined entity or by an appropriation by the general assembly. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to, the following expenses:

One hundred percent (100%) of the total salaries and benefits paid to the examining personnel of the office of internal audit engaged in those examinations;

All costs associated with the procurement of a forensic consultant;

All costs associated with a consultant that provides expertise pertinent to the examinee’s operations;

All reasonable administrative and technology costs related to the forensic examination process. Technology costs shall include the actual cost of software and hardware utilized in the examination process and the cost of training examination personnel in the proper use of the software and hardware.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-3.
Investigations or management advisory and consulting services upon request of governor or general assembly.

The office of internal audit may, upon the written request of the governor or of the general assembly, conduct audits, provide management advisory and consulting services, or conduct investigations relative to the financial affairs or the economy and efficiency of management, or both, of any public bodies as defined in §

35-7.1-1(e)

. The office of internal audit may, from time to time, make such investigations and additional reports to the governor, the director of the department of administration, the director of the office of management and budget, and the general assembly as deemed necessary or advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-4.
Management advisory and consulting services provided to public bodies.

When requested in writing by a public body to the chief, the office of internal audit may provide management advisory or consulting services to the public body. Any such request must include the scope of services requested and a schedule for the work to be performed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-5.
Persons authorized to conduct audits — Reports of irregularities.

Any qualified person duly authorized by the director of management and budget to act as auditor may examine the books, papers, and documents of any public body having control of state or federal funds, and if the audit discloses any irregularities or improper handling of records or funds, the auditor shall report the same to the chief who shall, in turn, report such findings and recommendations to the director of management and budget, who shall further report to the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-6.
Inspection of records and papers — Investigations.

The chief, in carrying out the duties outlined in this chapter, shall have access to all records, reports, audits, reviews, papers, books, documents, recommendations, correspondence, including information relative to the purchase of goods or services or anticipated purchase of goods or services, from any agent, contractor, or vendor by any public body, as defined in §

35-7.1-1(e)

, and any other data and material that is maintained by or available to any public body regardless of the media in which it is maintained which is in any way related to the programs and operations with respect to public bodies.

The chief may request information and records, cooperation, and assistance from any state, or local governmental agency as may be necessary for carrying out his/her duties and responsibilities. Upon receipt of such request, each person in charge of the public body shall furnish to the chief, or his/her authorized agent or representative, such information and records, cooperation and assistance, including information relative to the purchase of goods or services or anticipated purchase of goods or services from any contractor or vendor by any public body, within ten (10) business days of receipt of the chief’s request. If the public body is unable to comply with the request for records and/or information within (10) business days, the public body must notify the chief, prior to the expiration of the ten (10) business days, in writing as to the reason, or reasons, why the request cannot be fulfilled within this time and whether additional time is necessary.

The chief may initiate and conduct audits, investigations, and compliance reviews and shall prepare detailed findings, conclusions, and recommendations concerning the administration of programs or operations, and internal controls over processes of public bodies.

The chief shall have direct and prompt access to any public body, its agents, officers, and employees when necessary for any purpose pertaining to the performance of his/her duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-7.
Complaint — Investigation.

The chief shall accept and may investigate or audit complaints or information from any identified individual concerning the possible existence of any activity constituting fraud, waste, abuse, or mismanagement relating to programs and operations of public bodies.

The chief shall not, after receipt of a complaint or information from an employee, contractor, or private citizen who requests confidentiality, disclose the identity of that individual, without the written consent of said individual, unless the chief determines such disclosure is necessary and unavoidable during the course of an investigation. In such event, the individual filing the complaint shall be notified, if possible, immediately of such disclosure.

Employees are protected under the chapter 50 of title 28 “Rhode Island Whistleblowers’ Protection Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-8.
Reports to the state police.

In carrying out his/her duties and responsibilities, the chief shall report to the Rhode Island state police whenever the chief has reasonable grounds to believe there has been a violation of federal or state criminal law. The chief shall also refer findings to the state ethics commission, or to any other federal, state, or local agency with an interest in said findings, in the discretion of the chief. Any referrals made under this section shall not be made public by the office of internal audit.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-9.
Coordination with other state agencies.

The chief may coordinate with other state agencies that are responsible for investigating, auditing, reviewing, or evaluating the management of public bodies for the purpose of sharing information and avoiding duplication of effort.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.

35-7.1-10.
Annual and interim reports.

The office of internal audit shall prepare an annual report summarizing the activities of the office of internal audit for the prior fiscal year. The office of internal audit may also prepare interim performance reports. These reports shall be presented to the director of management and budget. The annual reports shall be posted on the office’s website.

The annual report shall include, but not be limited to: a general description of significant problems in the areas of efficiencies, internal controls, fraud, waste, and abuse within programs and operations within the jurisdiction of the office; a general description of the recommendations for corrective actions made by the office during the reporting period with respect to significant deficiencies in the areas of efficiencies, internal controls, fraud, waste, and abuse; the identification of each significant recommendation described in previous annual reports on which corrective action has not been completed; a summary of matters referred to prosecuting authorities; a summary of any matters concerning the recovery of monies as a result of an audit finding or civil suit or a referral to another agency for the purposes of such suit; a list of all audit reports completed by the office during the reporting period; and a statement of recommendations of amendment to this chapter or the rules, regulations, or procedures governing the office of internal audit that would improve the effectiveness or the operations of the office.

The annual report of the office of internal audit shall be made public on the day of filing.

Within twenty (20) calendar days following the date of the issuance of the management-response copy of the draft audit report, the head of the department, agency, public body, or private entity audited shall respond, in writing, to each recommendation made in the audit report. This response shall address the department’s, agency’s, or public body’s or private entity’s plan of corrective action, the party responsible to implement the corrective action plan, and the anticipated date to complete the implementation of the corrective action; and, if applicable, the reasons for disagreement with any recommendation proposed in the audit report and justification of management’s acceptance of risk. The office of internal audit may perform follow-up procedures for the purpose of determining whether the department, agency, public body, or private entity has implemented, in an efficient and effective manner, its plan of correction action for the recommendations proposed in the audit report or addressed the risk discussed in the audit report.

Copies of each audit report, inclusive of management’s responses noted in subsection (d) shall be submitted to the chairpersons of the house finance committee, and the senate finance committee and posted on the office’s website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 10.